Hawaii statutes.
[§125C-9] Investigations and surveys.
The governor or the governor's authorized representative may make
investigations and surveys for the purpose of ascertaining facts to be used in
administering this chapter, and in making the investigations and surveys, may
require the making, filing, or keeping of applications, schedules, records,
reports, or statements, under oath or otherwise, administer oaths, take
evidence under oath, subpoena witnesses, and require the production of books,
papers, and records. Witnesses shall be allowed their fees and mileage as in
cases in the circuit courts. The circuit court of any circuit or judge thereof
may enforce by proper proceedings the attendance and testimony of any witness
subpoenaed to appear within the circuit, or the production of books, papers,
and records. [L 1975, c 38, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next